Montana, session 2025, SB26.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 2-18-503, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-18-503. Mileage -- allowance. (1) Members of the legislature, state officers and employees, jurors,
witnesses, county agents, and all other persons who may be entitled to mileage paid from public funds when
using their own motor vehicles in the performance of official duties are entitled to collect mileage for the
distance actually traveled by motor vehicle and no more unless otherwise specifically provided by law.
(2) (a) When a state officer or employee is authorized to travel by motor vehicle and chooses to
use a privately owned motor vehicle even though a government-owned or government-leased motor vehicle is
available, the officer or employee may be reimbursed only at the rate of 48.15% of the mileage rate allowed by
the United States internal revenue service for the current year.
(b) When a privately owned motor vehicle is used because a government-owned or government-
leased motor vehicle is not available or because the use is in the best interest of the governmental entity and a
notice of unavailability of a government-owned or government-leased motor vehicle or a specific exemption is
attached to the travel claim, then a rate equal to the mileage allotment allowed by the United States internal
revenue service for the current year must be paid for the first 1,000 miles and 3 cents less per mile for all
additional miles traveled within a given calendar month.
(3) Members of the legislature, jurors, Members of the legislature, jurors, witnesses, county
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 26
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0026
agents, and all other persons, except a state officer or employee, who may be entitled to mileage paid from
public funds when using their own motor vehicles in the performance of official duties are entitled to collect
mileage at a rate equal to the mileage allotment allowed by the United States internal revenue service for the
current year for the first 1,000 miles and 3 cents less per mile for all additional miles traveled within a given
calendar month.
(4) Members of the legislature, state officers and employees, jurors, witnesses, county agents, and
all other persons who may be entitled to mileage paid from public funds when using their own airplanes in the
performance of official duties are entitled to collect mileage for the nautical air miles actually traveled at a rate
of twice the mileage allotment for motor vehicle travel and no more unless specifically provided by law.
(5) This section does not alter 5-2-301.
(6) The department of administration shall prescribe policies necessary for the effective
administration of this section for state government. The Montana Administrative Procedure Act, Title 2, chapter
4, does not apply to policies prescribed to administer this part."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 26
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 26, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 26
INTRODUCED BY K. BOGNER
BY REQUEST OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
AN ACT ALLOWING LEGISLATORS, JURORS, WITNESSES, COUNTY AGENTS, AND ALL OTHER
PERSONS USING THEIR OWN MOTOR VEHICLES IN THE PERFORMANCE OF OFFICIAL DUTIESTO
COLLECT MILEAGE AT A RATE EQUAL TO THE MILEAGE ALLOTMENT ALLOWED BY THE UNITED
STATES INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE FOR THE CURRENT YEAR; AMENDING SECTION 2-18-503, MCA;
AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”